District of Columbia statutes.
8-1703

Established.

There is established the Soil and Water Conservation District as a District of Columbia government agency.

Sept. 14, 1982, D.C. Law 4-143, § 4, 29 DCR 3118
Section 15 of D.C. Law 4-143 provided that the Soil and Water Conservation District, established by § 8-1703, shall terminate on January 1, 1987, unless it is subsequently reestablished by an act of the Council of the District of Columbia. Section 8-1721, reestablishing the Soil and Water Conservation District, was enacted July 25, 1987.
1981 Ed., § 1-2803.
This section is referenced in § 8-1721.